pt-PT: Decalque ponto de apresentação tipo: Painel da carroçaria; Para-choques; Capacete; Capô; Espelho; Carenagem de mota; Vidro traseiro; Tejadilho; Vidro lateral; Porta da bagageira/bagageira; Janela; Para-brisas; Outro
zh-TW: 貼紙黏貼位置類型: 車身板金; 保險桿; 安全帽; 引擎蓋; 後照鏡; 機車整流罩; 後車窗; 車頂; 側邊車窗; 尾門/後車廂; 窗戶; 擋風玻璃; 其他
sk-SK: Typ umiestnenia nálepky: Panel karosérie; Nárazník; Prilba; Kapota; Zrkadlo; Motocyklová kapotáž; Zadné okno; Strecha; Bočné okno; Zadné výklopné dvere/kufor; Okno; Čelné sklo; Iné
sv: Typ av dekalplacering: Karosspanel; Stötfångare; Hjälm; Motorhuv; Spegel; Motorcykelkåpa; Bakruta; Tak; Sidofönster; Baklucka/bagagelucka; Fönster; Vindruta; Övrigt
fi: Teippauksen sijoituspaikka: Koripaneeli; Puskuri; Kypärä; Konepelti; Peili; Moottoripyörän kate; Takalasi; Katto; Sivuikkuna; Takaluukku/tavaratila; Ikkuna; Tuulilasi; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta namestitve nalepke: Pločevina vozila; Odbijač; Čelada; Pokrov motorja; Ogledalo; Oklep motornega kolesa; Zadnje steklo; Streha; Stransko steklo; Prtljažna vrata/prtljažnik; Okno; Vetrobransko steklo; Drugo
en: Decal placement type: Body panel; Bumper; Helmet; Hood; Mirror; Motorcycle fairing; Rear window; Roof; Side window; Tailgate/Trunk; Window; Windshield; Other
pl: Typ umiejscowienia naklejki: Panel karoserii; Zderzak; Kask; Maska; Lusterko; Owiewka motocyklowa; Tylna szyba; Dach; Szyba boczna; Klapa bagażnika/Bagażnik; Szyba; Przednia szyba; Inne
ko: 데칼 부착 위치 유형: 차체 패널; 범퍼; 헬멧; 후드; 미러; 오토바이 페어링; 뒷유리; 루프; 측면 유리; 테일게이트/트렁크; 창문; 윈드실드; 기타
pt-BR: Tipo de posicionamento do decalque: Painel da carroceria; Para-choque; Capacete; Capô; Espelho; Carenagem de moto; Vidro traseiro; Teto; Vidro lateral; Tampa do porta-malas; Vidro; Para-brisa; Outro
tr: Çıkartma yerleşim tipi: Gövde paneli; Tampon; Kask; Kaput; Ayna; Motosiklet grenajı; Arka cam; Tavan; Yan cam; Bagaj kapağı/bagaj; Pencere; Ön cam; Diğer
zh-CN: 贴花放置类型: 车身面板; 保险杠; 头盔; 引擎盖; 后视镜; 摩托车整流罩; 后窗; 车顶; 侧窗; 尾门/后备箱; 车窗; 挡风玻璃; 其他
it: Tipo di posizionamento dell'adesivo: Pannello della carrozzeria; Paraurti; Casco; Cofano; Specchietto; Carenatura moto; Lunotto; Tetto; Finestrino laterale; Portellone/bagagliaio; Finestrino/vetro; Parabrezza; Altro
nb: Type plassering av klistremerke: Karosseripanel; Støtfanger; Hjelm; Panser; Speil; Motorsykkelkåpe; Bakrute; Tak; Siderute; Bakluke/bagasjerom; Vindu; Frontrute; Annet
ru: Тип размещения декали: Панель кузова; Бампер; Шлем; Капот; Зеркало; Обтекатель мотоцикла; Заднее стекло; Крыша; Боковое стекло; Дверь багажника/багажник; Стекло; Лобовое стекло; Другое
da: Placeringstype for mærkater: Karosseridel; Kofanger; Hjelm; Motorhjelm; Spejl; Motorcykelkåbe; Bagrude; Tag; Siderude; Bagklap/bagagerum; Vindue; Forrude; Andet
ro-RO: Tip de poziționare a autocolantului: Panou de caroserie; Bară de protecție; Cască; Capotă; Oglindă; Carenaj motocicletă; Lunetă; Plafon; Geam lateral; Hayon/Portbagaj; Geam; Parbriz; Altele
bg-BG: Тип поставяне на стикер: Панел на каросерията; Броня; Каска; Преден капак; Огледало; Обтекател за мотоциклет; Задно стъкло; Покрив; Странично стъкло; Задна врата/багажник; Стъкло; Предно стъкло; Друго
fr: Type de positionnement de l’autocollant: Panneau de carrosserie; Pare-chocs; Casque; Capot; Rétroviseur; Carénage de moto; Lunette arrière; Toit; Vitre latérale; Hayon/coffre; Vitre; Pare-brise; Autre
nl: Decal plaatsing type: Carrosseriepaneel; Bumper; Helm; Motorkap; Spiegel; Motorfietskuip; Achterruit; Dak; Zijruit; Achterklep/kofferbak; Raam; Voorruit; Overige
hr-HR: Vrsta položaja naljepnice: Ploča karoserije; Branik; Kaciga; Poklopac motora; Retrovizor; Oklop motocikla; Stražnje staklo; Krov; Bočno staklo; Vrata prtljažnika / prtljažnik; Staklo; Vjetrobransko staklo; Ostalo
th: ประเภทตำแหน่งการติดสติกเกอร์ดีคอล: ตัวถังรถ; กันชน; หมวกกันน็อก; ฝากระโปรงรถ; กระจกมองข้าง; แฟริ่งรถมอเตอร์ไซค์; กระจกหลัง; หลังคารถ; กระจกข้าง; ฝาท้าย/กระโปรงหลังรถ; หน้าต่าง; กระจกหน้ารถ; อื่นๆ
hu: Matrica elhelyezésének típusa: Karosszériaelem; Lökhárító; Sisak; Motorháztető; Tükör; Motorkerékpár-idom; Hátsó ablak; Tető; Oldalablak; Csomagtérajtó/Csomagtartó; Ablak; Szélvédő; Egyéb
vi: Loại vị trí dán decal: Tấm ốp thân xe; Cản xe; Mũ bảo hiểm; Nắp ca pô; Gương; Dàn áo xe máy; Kính sau; Nóc xe; Kính hông; Cửa sau/Cốp xe; Cửa sổ; Kính chắn gió; Khác
ja: デカール配置タイプ: ボディパネル; バンパー; ヘルメット; フード; ミラー; オートバイカウル; リアウィンドウ; ルーフ; サイドウィンドウ; テールゲート/トランク; ウィンドウ; フロントガラス; その他
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης αυτοκόλλητου: Πάνελ αμαξώματος; Προφυλακτήρας; Κράνος; Καπό; Καθρέπτης; Φέρινγκ μοτοσικλέτας; Πίσω παρμπρίζ; Οροφή; Πλευρικό τζάμι; Πόρτα χώρου αποσκευών/πορτμπαγκάζ; Τζάμι; Παρμπρίζ; Άλλο
cs: Typ umístění obtisku: Panel karoserie; Nárazník; Helma; Kapota; Zrcátko; Kapotáž motocyklu; Zadní sklo; Střecha; Boční okno; Dveře zavazadlového prostoru / kufr; Okno; Čelní sklo; Jiné
es: Tipo de ubicación de la calcomanía: Panel de la carrocería; Parachoques; Casco; Capó; Espejo; Carenado de motocicleta; Ventana trasera; Techo; Ventana lateral; Puerta trasera/maletero; Ventana; Parabrisas; Otro
de: Platzierungsart des Aufklebers: Karosserieteil; Stoßstange; Helm; Motorhaube; Spiegel; Motorradverkleidung; Heckscheibe; Dach; Seitenfenster; Heckklappe/Kofferraum; Fenster; Windschutzscheibe; Sonstige
lt-LT: Lipduko vietos tipas: Kėbulo plokštė; Buferis; Šalmas; Variklio dangtis; Veidrodėlis; Motociklo aptakas; Galinis langas; Stogas; Šoninis langas; Bagažinės dangtis; Langas; Priekinis stiklas; Kita